dictsource/kn_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded 
// Spelling to phoneme rules for Kannada

// A means vowel letters (not vowel signs)
// B means a combining vowel sign or a virama


.replace
೦	0	// Convert Kannada numbers
೧	1
೨	2
೩	3
೪	4
೫	5
೬	6
೭	7
೮	8
೯	9

.L01 ಕ ಖ ಗ ಘ ಙ   // velar

.L02 ಚ ಛ ಜ ಝ ಞ  // palatal

.L03 ಟ ಠ ಡ ಢ ಣ  // retroflex

.L04 ತ ಥ ದ ಧ ನ   // dental

.L05 ಪ ಫ ಬ ಭ ಮ  // labial


.group ಕ
	ಕ	ka
	ಕ (B	k

.group ಖ
	ಖ	k#a
	ಖ (B	k#

.group ಗ
	ಗ	ga
	ಗ (B	g

.group ಘ
	ಘ	g#a
	ಘ (B	g#

.group ಙ
	ಙ	Na
	ಙ (B	N

.group ಚ
	ಚ	ca
	ಚ (B	c

.group ಛ
	ಛ	c#a
	ಛ (B	c#

.group ಜ
	ಜ	Ja
	ಜ (B	J
	ಜ಼	za   // nukta
	ಜ಼ (B	z

.group ಝ
	ಝ	J#a
	ಝ (B	J#

.group ಞ
	ಞ	n^a
	ಞ (B	n^

.group ಟ
	ಟ	t.a
	ಟ (B	t.

.group ಠ
	ಠ	t.#a
	ಠ (B	t.#

.group ಡ
	ಡ	d.a
	ಡ (B	d.

.group ಢ
	ಢ	d.#a
	ಢ (B	d.#

.group ಣ
	ಣ	n.a
	ಣ (B	n.

.group ತ
	ತ	ta
	ತ (B	t

.group ಥ
	ಥ	t#a
	ಥ (B	t#

.group ದ
	ದ	da
	ದ (B	d

.group ಧ
	ಧ	d#a
	ಧ (B	d#

.group ನ
	ನ	na
	ನ (B	n

.group ಪ
	ಪ	pa
	ಪ (B	p

.group ಫ
	ಫ	p#a
	ಫ (B	p#
	ಫ಼	fa    // nukta
	ಫ಼ (B	f

.group ಬ
	ಬ	ba
	ಬ (B	b

.group ಭ
	ಭ	b#a
	ಭ (B	b#

.group ಮ
	ಮ	ma
	ಮ (B	m

.group ಯ
	ಯ	ja
	ಯ (B	j

.group ರ
	ರ	ra
	ರ (B	r

.group ಱ
	ಱ	ra
	ಱ (B	r

.group ಲ
	ಲ	la
	ಲ (B	l

.group ಳ
	ಳ	l.a
	ಳ (B	l.

.group ವ
	ವ	va
	ವ (B	v

.group ಶ
	ಶ	S;a
	ಶ (B	S;

.group ಷ
	ಷ	s.a
	ಷ (B	s.

.group ಸ
	ಸ	sa
	ಸ (B	s

.group ಹ
	ಹ	ha
	ಹ (B	h

.group ೞ
	ೞ	fa
	ೞ (B	f

.group ೠ
	ೠ	r-


// Stand-alone vowels
.group ಅ
	ಅ	a

.group ಆ
	ಆ	a:

.group ಇ
	ಇ	i

.group ಈ
	ಈ	i:

.group ಉ
	ಉ	u

.group ಊ
	ಊ	u:

.group ಋ
	ಋ	ru

.group ಎ
	ಎ	e

.group ಏ
	ಏ	e:

.group ಐ
	ಐ	aI

.group ಒ
	ಒ	o

.group ಓ
	ಓ	o:

.group ಔ
	ಔ	aU



.group 0xe0b2   // characters which start with UTF-8 bytes: [e0 b2]

	ಂ(L01	N	// anusvara (this should nasalize the vowel)
	ಂ(L02	n^
	ಂ(L03	n.
	ಂ(L04	n
	ಂ	m

	ಃ	h	// visarga

// combining vowel signs

	ಾ	a:

	ಿ	i


.group 0xe0b3   // characters which start with UTF-8 bytes: [e0 b3]

	ೀ	i:

	ು	u

	ೂ	u:

	ೃ	ru

	ೄ	r-:

	ೆ	e

	ೇ	e:

	ೈ	aI

	ೊ	o

	ೋ	o:

	ೌ	aU

	್	// virama
//	್ (C	y   // virama+consonant, insert epenthetic vowel

	ೕ	:   // length mark ??
	ೖ	:   // ai length mark ??


.group 0xe0a4  // devanagari
	0xe0a4  _^_HI  // switch to hindi voice for devanagari characters
.group 0xe0a5  // devanagari
	0xe0a5  _^_HI


.group
	$	do:l.ar
